Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 SHORT TITLE 2 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 3 cited as the âIowa Skilled Workforce Actâ. 4 DIVISION II 5 IOWA REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP ACT 6 Sec. 2. Section 84D.2, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 5. âApprenticeship sponsorâ means an entity operating 9 an apprenticeship program or an entity in whose name an 10 apprenticeship program is being operated, which entity is 11 registered with or approved by the United States department 12 of labor, office of apprenticeship, or the Iowa office of 13 apprenticeship. âApprenticeship sponsorâ includes a lead 14 apprenticeship sponsor, sponsor, or intermediary, and an 15 employer who provides training through a lead apprenticeship 16 sponsor, sponsor, intermediary sponsor, or intermediary. 17 Sec. 3. Section 84D.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsections: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âIntermediary sponsorâ means an entity 20 that provides apprenticeship training to multiple employers and 21 serves as the sponsor of the apprentices. 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 16A. âPartner employerâ means an employer 23 who trains the employerâs employees through an intermediary 24 sponsor. 25 Sec. 4. Section 84D.2, subsection 19, paragraph a, 26 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 (c) Related training instruction from a lead apprenticeship 29 sponsor, sponsor, intermediary sponsor, or intermediary. 30 Sec. 5. Section 84D.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 by adding the following new paragraph: 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. An intermediary or intermediary sponsor 33 has the sole discretion for approving partner employers, 34 provided that such partner employers are compliant with 35 -1- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 1/ 17 H.F. _____ the partner employersâ responsibilities outlined in the 1 intermediaryâs or intermediary sponsorâs standards. 2 Sec. 6. Section 84D.4, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 8. a. The office shall develop a plan providing a procedure 5 for the cancellation or deregistration, or both, of programs 6 and for temporary suspension, cancellation, deregistration, or 7 any of these, of apprenticeship agreements. 8 b. The office shall not cancel, suspend, or deregister an 9 intermediary or intermediary sponsor based on the actions of 10 the intermediaryâs or intermediary sponsorâs partner employers. 11 However, the office may require an intermediary or intermediary 12 sponsor to cancel or suspend a partner employer due to the 13 partner employerâs material breach of responsibilities as 14 outlined in the intermediaryâs or intermediary sponsorâs 15 standards. 16 c. (1) The office may only cancel, suspend, or deregister 17 an approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary, intermediary 18 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor due to a material 19 breach of the requirements of this chapter. Prior to 20 any permanent or temporary cancellation, suspension, or 21 deregistration, the office must provide a comprehensive list of 22 the grounds of the alleged material breach in writing to the 23 approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary, intermediary 24 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor and allow at least 25 ninety days to become compliant. 26 (2) A decision by the office to cancel, suspend, or 27 deregister an approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary, 28 intermediary sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor must be 29 issued in writing and must state the reasons for the officeâs 30 decision. The office shall not issue such a decision before 31 the conclusion of the ninety-day period or later than thirty 32 days after the conclusion of the period. The decision shall be 33 considered final agency action subject to judicial review as 34 provided in section 17A.19. However, notwithstanding section 35 -2- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 2/ 17 H.F. _____ 17A.19, the office shall have the burden to prove that the 1 approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary, intermediary 2 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor materially breached 3 this chapter and that the breach continued past the ninety-day 4 period. 5 d. If an apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary, intermediary 6 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor is canceled, suspended, 7 or deregistered, the apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary, 8 intermediary sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor shall have 9 the right to reapply for a registration after sixty days. The 10 office shall not use the prior cancellation, suspension, or 11 deregistration as the basis for denying the reapplication. 12 Sec. 7. Section 84D.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 84D.7 Requirements for sponsors and employers. 15 A sponsor of a quality pre-apprenticeship program, 16 youth apprenticeship program, registered apprenticeship 17 program, or apprenticeship program is responsible for the 18 administration and supervision of on-the-job training and 19 related technical instruction for each apprentice in the 20 quality pre-apprenticeship program, youth apprenticeship 21 program, registered apprenticeship program, or apprenticeship 22 program. When training is provided by a lead apprenticeship 23 sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or intermediary, the employer 24 of the apprentice is responsible for the administration and 25 supervision of on-the-job training, and the lead apprenticeship 26 sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or intermediary is responsible 27 for related technical instruction for each apprenticeship. 28 DIVISION III 29 IOWA PLUMBER, MECHANICAL PROFESSIONAL, AND CONTRACTOR LICENSING 30 ACT ââ APPRENTICESHIPS 31 Sec. 8. Section 105.18, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 32 following new subsection: 33 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Regulation of apprenticeships. 34 a. A licensed journeyperson or master may employ or 35 -3- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 3/ 17 H.F. _____ supervise licensed apprentices at a ratio not to exceed three 1 apprentices to one licensee. 2 b. The requirements of this section do not apply to 3 apprenticeship classroom training. 4 DIVISION IV 5 IOWA APPRENTICESHIP ACT 6 Sec. 9. Section 84E.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. âIntermediary sponsorâ means an entity 9 that provides apprenticeship training to multiple employers and 10 serves as the sponsor of the apprentices. 11 Sec. 10. Section 84E.4, subsections 1, 2, 3, and 4, Code 12 2026, are amended to read as follows: 13 1. a. An apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or 14 lead apprenticeship sponsor that conducts an apprenticeship 15 program that is registered with the United States department of 16 labor, office of apprenticeship, through Iowa, for apprentices 17 who will be employed at worksites located in this state may 18 apply to the department for financial assistance under this 19 section if the apprenticeship program includes a minimum of one 20 hundred contact hours per apprentice for each training year of 21 the apprenticeship program. 22 b. Financial assistance received by an apprenticeship 23 sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or lead apprenticeship 24 sponsor under this section shall be used only for the cost of 25 conducting and maintaining an apprenticeship program. 26 c. An apprenticeship sponsor whose apprentices receive 27 contact hours from a lead apprenticeship sponsor is not 28 eligible for financial assistance under this chapter. 29 2. The department shall provide financial assistance in the 30 form of training grants to eligible apprenticeship sponsors , 31 intermediary sponsors, or lead apprenticeship sponsors in the 32 following manner: 33 a. By determining the total amount of funding allocated 34 for purposes of training grants for apprenticeship programs 35 -4- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 4/ 17 H.F. _____ pursuant to section 84E.3 . 1 b. By determining the total number of apprentices trained 2 during the most recent training year, as calculated on the 3 last day of the training year, in all apprenticeship programs 4 conducted by all applying apprenticeship sponsors , intermediary 5 sponsors, or lead apprenticeship sponsors eligible to apply for 6 financial assistance under subsection 1 . 7 c. By determining the total number of apprentices trained 8 during the most recent training year, as calculated on the 9 last day of the training year, in each apprenticeship program 10 conducted by each apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary 11 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor eligible to apply under 12 subsection 1 , and that applied for financial assistance under 13 subsection 1 . 14 d. By determining the proportion, stated as a percentage, 15 that each applying apprenticeship sponsorâs , intermediary 16 sponsorâs, or lead apprenticeship sponsorâs total calculated 17 pursuant to paragraph âcâ bears to all applying apprenticeship 18 sponsorsâ , intermediary sponsorsâ, or lead apprenticeship 19 sponsorsâ total calculated pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 20 e. By multiplying the percentage calculated in paragraph âdâ 21 by the amount determined in paragraph âaâ . 22 3. An apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or 23 lead apprenticeship sponsor seeking financial assistance under 24 this section shall provide the following information to the 25 department: 26 a. The federal apprentice registration number of each 27 apprentice in the apprenticeship program. 28 b. The address and a description of the physical location 29 where in-person training is conducted. 30 c. A certification of the apprenticeship sponsorâs or 31 intermediary sponsorâs training standards as most recently 32 approved by the United States department of labor, office 33 of apprenticeship or, in the case of a lead apprenticeship 34 sponsor, a representative sample of participating membersâ 35 -5- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 5/ 17 H.F. _____ training standards. 1 d. A certification of the apprenticeship sponsorâs or 2 intermediary sponsorâs compliance review or quality assessment 3 as most recently conducted by the United States department of 4 labor, office of apprenticeship, unless the apprenticeship 5 sponsor has not been subjected to a compliance review or 6 quality assessment. In the case of a lead apprenticeship 7 sponsor, a sampling of compliance reviews or quality 8 assessments from participating members shall be sufficient. 9 e. Any other information the department reasonably 10 determines is necessary. 11 4. The apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or 12 lead apprenticeship sponsor and the department shall enter 13 into an agreement regarding the provision of any financial 14 assistance to the apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, 15 or lead apprenticeship sponsor. 16 Sec. 11. Section 84G.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023 2026 , 19 and for each fiscal year thereafter, there is annually 20 appropriated from the workforce development fund account to 21 the apprenticeship training program fund created in section 22 84E.3 three four million five hundred thousand dollars for the 23 purposes of chapter 84E . 24 DIVISION V 25 CAREER TRAINING PHYSICAL EXPANSION PROGRAM ââ FUNDING OF 26 CERTAIN DEGREE PROGRAMS AT REGENTS INSTITUTIONS 27 Sec. 12. Section 84A.5, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . m. The career training physical expansion 30 program under chapter 84J. 31 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 84J.1 Definition. 32 As used in this chapter, âdepartmentâ means the department of 33 workforce development. 34 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 84J.2 Career training physical 35 -6- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 6/ 17 H.F. _____ expansion program. 1 1. A career training physical expansion program is created 2 that shall be administered by the department. The purpose 3 of the program is to provide financial assistance for the 4 construction of new facilities that will expand the capacity 5 of community colleges and unionized and nonunionized private 6 sector apprenticeship programs to provide education and 7 training for workers in high-demand fields in this state. 8 2. The department shall establish eligibility requirements, 9 award criteria, and application and other necessary procedures 10 for the program. To be eligible for financial assistance, a 11 community college or apprenticeship program must demonstrate 12 to the department that construction of the new facility will 13 directly result in an increase in the number of workers in 14 high-demand fields in this state by expanding the physical 15 capacity of the community college or apprenticeship program to 16 train more students or apprentices in such fields. Projects 17 to increase internet-based education or training shall be 18 ineligible for financial assistance. 19 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 84J.3 Career training physical 20 expansion program fund. 21 1. A career training physical expansion program fund is 22 created as a fund in the state treasury under the control of 23 the department. 24 2. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated for 25 purposes of the career training physical expansion program, 26 and any other moneys lawfully available to the department for 27 purposes of this chapter. 28 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department for 29 the purposes of this chapter. 30 4. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at 31 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall 32 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 33 for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 34 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 35 -7- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 7/ 17 H.F. _____ be credited to the fund. 1 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 84J.4 Rules. 2 The department of workforce development shall adopt rules 3 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this chapter. 4 DIVISION VI 5 DEPARTMENT-APPROVED TRAINING 6 Sec. 17. Section 96.4, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 2026, 7 is amended to read as follows: 8 a. An otherwise eligible individual shall not be denied 9 benefits for any week because the individual is in training 10 with the approval of the director, nor shall the individual 11 be denied benefits with respect to any week in which the 12 individual is in training with the approval of the director by 13 reason of the application of the provision in subsection 3 of 14 this section relating to availability for work, and an active 15 search for work or the provision of section 96.5, subsection 16 3 , relating to failure to apply for or a refusal to accept 17 suitable work. However, an employerâs account shall not be 18 charged with benefits so paid. The director shall not deny 19 approval of training that otherwise qualifies for approval 20 under this paragraph if all of the following apply to the 21 training: 22 (1) The training is a part of an apprenticeship program 23 registered with the United States department of labor, office 24 of apprenticeship or the Iowa office of apprenticeship. 25 (2) Each training session lasts no longer than one week. 26 (3) The training is not located at a worksite. 27 DIVISION VII 28 APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING IN SCHOOL DISTRICTS 29 Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Increasing access to 30 apprenticeship training. 31 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 32 requires: 33 a. âApprenticeship sponsorâ , âquality pre-apprenticeship 34 programâ , âregistered apprenticeship programâ , âwork-based 35 -8- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 8/ 17 H.F. _____ learningâ , and âyouth apprenticeshipâ mean the same as defined 1 in section 84D.2. 2 b. âHVACâ means the same as defined in section 105.2. 3 2. The board of directors of each school district is 4 encouraged to establish or expand quality pre-apprenticeship 5 opportunities and youth apprenticeship programs at secondary 6 schools in partnership with apprenticeship sponsors and the 7 Iowa office of apprenticeship. Activities boards may pursue 8 in furtherance of this goal include but are not limited to all 9 of the following: 10 a. Aligning existing industrial technology, construction, 11 electronics, metalwork, and related coursework with 12 requirements of registered apprenticeship programs. 13 b. Establishing new coursework in subjects such as plumbing, 14 HVAC, and math for skilled trades as well as an introductory 15 course on apprenticeships to prepare students for a wide 16 variety of opportunities in registered apprenticeship programs. 17 c. Construction, improvement, or expansion of skilled trade 18 extension centers to provide additional work-based learning 19 opportunities. 20 d. Partnering with apprenticeship sponsors to ensure 21 curricula for coursework described in paragraphs âaâ , âbâ , and 22 âcâ are industry-aligned so that such coursework can be credited 23 toward completion of an apprenticeship. 24 3. The board of directors of each school district is 25 encouraged to establish a work-based learning coordinator at 26 each secondary school. The work-based learning coordinator 27 shall facilitate implementation of this section and other 28 pre-apprenticeship, apprenticeship, and work-based learning 29 initiatives at the school. A work-based learning coordinator 30 shall have prior experience relevant to implementation of 31 quality pre-apprenticeships, youth apprenticeships, or other 32 work-based learning initiatives. 33 4. The board of directors of each school district is 34 encouraged to pursue funding sources and in-kind contributions 35 -9- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 9/ 17 H.F. _____ through private sector partnerships and from apprenticeship 1 sponsors and nonprofit sources to implement this section. 2 5. It is the intent of the general assembly that school 3 districts implement this section no later than the school year 4 beginning July 1, 2028. 5 DIVISION VIII 6 HIGH-DEMAND JOBS AND SCHOLARSHIP ELIGIBILITY 7 Sec. 19. Section 84A.1B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 3. Create, and update as necessary every five years , a 10 list of high-demand jobs statewide for purposes of the future 11 ready Iowa registered apprenticeship programs created in 12 chapter 84F , the summer youth intern pilot program established 13 under section 84A.12 , the Iowa employer innovation program 14 established under section 84A.13 , the future ready Iowa skilled 15 workforce last-dollar scholarship program established under 16 section 256.228 , the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 17 program established under section 256.229 , and postsecondary 18 summer classes for high school students as provided under 19 section 261E.8, subsection 8 . In addition to the list created 20 by the workforce development board under this subsection , 21 each community college, in consultation with regional career 22 and technical education planning partnerships, and with the 23 approval of the board of directors of the community college, 24 may identify and maintain a list of not more than five regional 25 high-demand jobs in the community college region, and shall 26 share the lists with the workforce development board. The 27 lists submitted by community colleges under the subsection 28 may be used in that community college region for purposes of 29 programs identified under this subsection . The workforce 30 development board shall have full discretion collaborate 31 with community colleges to select and prioritize statewide 32 high-demand jobs after consulting with business and education 33 stakeholders, as appropriate, and seeking public comment. The 34 workforce development board may add to the list of high-demand 35 -10- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 10/ 17 H.F. _____ jobs as it deems necessary. For purposes of this subsection , 1 âhigh-demand jobâ means a job in the state that the board, or 2 a community college in accordance with this subsection , has 3 identified in accordance with this subsection . In creating 4 a list under this subsection , the following criteria, at a 5 minimum, shall apply: 6 a. An A competitive entry-level hourly wage of not less than 7 fourteen dollars . 8 b. Educational attainment of a qualifying credential up to a 9 bachelorâs degree. 10 c. One or both of the following criteria: 11 (1) Projected annual job openings of at least two hundred 12 fifty or more during the next five years. 13 (2) Annual job growth of at least one percent. 14 Sec. 20. Section 256.228, subsection 1, paragraph g, 15 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 (5) Has a student aid index of less than or equal to 17 twenty thousand dollars at the time of initial application, 18 as determined by the application forms submitted pursuant to 19 subparagraph (2), including the free application for federal 20 student aid Meets financial need criteria as established by the 21 commission . 22 Sec. 21. Section 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 b. Adopt rules under chapter 17A , in collaboration with 25 the department of workforce development, for administration of 26 this section , including but not limited to establishing the 27 duties and responsibilities of eligible institutions under 28 the program; defining residence and satisfactory academic 29 progress for purposes of the program; defining financial need 30 for purposes of the program; and establishing procedures 31 for scholarship application, processing, and approval. The 32 rules shall provide for determining the priority awarding of 33 scholarships if funds available for purposes of this section 34 are insufficient to pay all eligible students. Priority shall 35 -11- LSB 6872YC (3) 91 je/jh 11/ 17 H.F. _____ be given to fully awarding each eligible student approved for a 1 scholarship rather than to prorating scholarship awards among 2 all eligible students. 3 Sec. 22. Section 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 4 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 5 lieu thereof the following: 6 d. Transmit to the department of workforce development the 7 compilation of information, data, and statistics compiled under 8 subsection 1, paragraph âeâ , subparagraph (6). 9 DIVISION IX 10 CAREER AND TECHNICAL SECONDARY AUTHORIZATIONS 11 Sec. 23. Section 256.146, subsection 26, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 26. a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A that allow 14 an individual seeking a career and technical secondary 15 authorization to apply, and, if eligible, be issued the 16 secondary authorization prior to accepting an offer of 17 employment with a school. 18 b. The board shall limit qualifications for an applicant 19 for a career and technical secondary authorization to three 20 thousand hours of recent and relevant experience. The board 21 shall limit training requirements for an initial authorization 22 to ethics training. 23